Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.035

Postgraduate training licenses.

The board may grant approval to issue without examination a license to an osteopathic physician and surgeon in a board-approved postgraduate training program in this state if the applicant files an application and meets all the requirements for licensure set forth in RCW 18.57.020 except for completion of one year of postgraduate training. The secretary shall issue a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license that permits the physician in postgraduate training to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery only in connection with his or her duties as a physician in postgraduate training and does not authorize the physician to engage in any other form of practice. Each physician in postgraduate training shall practice osteopathic medicine and surgery only under the supervision of a physician licensed in this state under this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW, but such supervision shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician at the place where services are rendered.

All persons licensed under this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as set forth in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.

Persons applying for licensure pursuant to this section shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Any person who obtains a license pursuant to this section may, apply for licensure under this chapter, but shall submit a new application form and comply with all other licensing requirements of this chapter.

[ 1996 c 191 s 34; 1991 c 160 s 9.]